Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 4. Other Provisions

§ 551.
Application of laws to school districts.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in statute with respect to a class of school district or in a municipal charter, the laws of this title, the laws pertaining to municipal corporations, and the rules of the State Board shall apply to all school districts.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 28; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 552.
Validation of school districts and bonds voted for school construction.

No action shall be brought directly or indirectly attacking, questioning, or in any manner contesting the legality of the formation, or the existence as a body corporate and politic of any union school district created pursuant to chapter 11 of this title after six months from the date of recording in the office of the Secretary of State the certificate of the Secretary of Education designating the district as required by section 706g of this title; nor shall any action be brought directly or indirectly attacking, questioning, or in any manner contesting the legality or validity of bonds, issued or unissued, voted by a school district after six months from the date upon which voters in the school district met pursuant to warning and voted affirmatively to issue bonds to defray the cost of school improvements. This section shall be liberally construed to effect the legislative purpose to validate and make certain the legal existence of all school districts in this state and the validity of bonds issued by school districts, and to bar every right to question the existence of a school district or the validity of a bond voted by it, in any manner, and to bar every remedy therefor notwithstanding any defects or irregularities, jurisdictional or otherwise, after the expiration of the six-month period.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 29; amended

1971, No. 46

, eff. April 7, 1971;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 60, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 553.
Qualification of voters at school district meetings.

A person is qualified to vote at a school district meeting if by meeting day he or she would be eligible to vote at a town meeting held on that day.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 30; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 61, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 554.
School board meetings; majority vote, quorum, Robert’s Rules, public participation.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 172

, the concurrence of a majority of members present at a school board meeting shall be necessary and sufficient for board action.

A school board meeting shall be conducted in accordance with the Vermont Open Meeting Law. Robert’s Rules of Order shall govern the conduct of school board meetings. A school board shall afford a reasonable opportunity to any person in the school district to appear and express views in regard to any matter considered by the school board and, if requested to do so, shall give reasons for its action in writing.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 31; amended

1975, No. 48

, § 5, eff. April 15, 1975;

1991, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 555.
No liability for unauthorized or deficit spending.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that school boards should spend within the amount authorized by the electorate pursuant to this title and should not incur a deficit. However, the General Assembly recognizes that in the course of a school district budget year it may be necessary for expenditures to exceed revenues received or the amount authorized by the electorate.

A school board member shall not be liable under any law, including any criminal law, on the sole basis that the board has spent more than authorized under this title or that a deficit, as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 1523

, has occurred.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 32; amended

1995, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 8

, § 4;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 62, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 556.
Liability for damage to textbook or learning materials.

The parent or guardian of a student shall be liable to a school district for damage occasioned by loss, destruction, injury, or detention by the student of a textbook or other learning materials, to be recovered in an action on this statute in the name of the district.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 33; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 557.
Gratuity or compensation prohibited.

A member of the State Board, a supervisory union board, or a school board, the Secretary, and any person employed by one of the boards or by the Agency shall not solicit or receive directly or indirectly any gift or compensation for recommending or voting on any finding, ruling, decision, or report, or voting to procure any service, thing, or supply purchased with public funds. A violation of this provision is subject to

13 V.S.A. § 1106(b)

.

A member of the State Board, a supervisory union board or a school board, and any person employed by one of the boards shall not receive directly or indirectly anything of value, by contract or otherwise, from the school district or supervisory union he or she serves unless it is received:

as a result of a contract accepted after a public bid in accordance with law;

in public recognition of service or achievement;

as regular salary or expenses allowed by law for official duties performed as a member of the board; or

for employment according to the provisions of section 558 of this title.

No school board member or supervisory union board member shall vote on any contract or purchase in which he or she has a direct or indirect interest.

A person who violates subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 and shall be incapable of holding elective or appointed office in this State for two years next ensuing.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 34; amended

1989, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 64, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 558.
Eligibility for election to a school board; employment of school board members.

A legal voter in a school district shall be eligible for election to a school board; however, a member of a school board may not be regularly employed by the school district or by a school district within the same supervisory union, or by the same supervisory union during the board member’s term of office.

The Secretary may waive the provisions of this section for employment of a specific individual as a substitute teacher, coach, or supervisor of extracurricular activities for a period not to exceed one year, which may be renewed if the school district or supervisory union is unable to hire another qualified person through no fault of its own.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 35; amended

1989, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 559.
Public bids.

Cost threshold. When the cost exceeds $40,000.00, a school board or supervisory union board shall publicly advertise or invite three or more bids from persons deemed capable of providing items or services if costs are in excess of $40,000.00 for any of the following:

the construction, purchase, lease, or improvement of any school building;

the purchase or lease of any item or items required for supply, equipment, maintenance, repair, or transportation of students; or

a contract for transportation, maintenance, or repair services.

High-cost construction contracts. When a school construction contract exceeds $500,000.00:

The State Board shall establish, in consultation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services and with other knowledgeable sources, general rules for the prequalification of bidders on such a contract. The Department of Buildings and General Services, upon notice by the Secretary, shall provide to school boards undergoing construction projects suggestions and recommendations on bidders qualified to provide construction services.

At least 60 days prior to the proposed bid opening on any construction contract to be awarded by a school board that exceeds $500,000.00, the school board shall publicly advertise for contractors interested in bidding on the project. The advertisement shall indicate that the school board has established prequalification criteria that a contractor must meet and shall invite any interested contractor to apply to the school board for prequalification. All interested contractors shall submit their qualifications to the school board, which shall determine a list of eligible prospective bidders based on the previously established criteria. At least 30 days prior to the proposed bid opening, the school board shall give written notice of the board’s determination to each contractor that submitted qualifications. The school board shall consider all bids submitted by prequalified bidders meeting the deadline.

Contract award.

A contract for any such item or service to be obtained pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be awarded to one of the three lowest responsible bids conforming to specifications, with consideration being given to quantities involved, time required for delivery, purpose for which required, competency and responsibility of bidder, and his or her ability to render satisfactory service. A board shall have the right to reject any or all bids.

A contract for any property, construction, good, or service to be obtained pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bid conforming to specifications. However, when considering the base contract amount and without considering cost overruns, if the two lowest responsible bids are within one percent of each other, the board may award the contract to either bidder. A board shall have the right to reject any bid found not to be responsible or conforming to specifications or to reject all bids.

Construction management. The school board may contract for the service of construction management to assist in a school construction project. The State Board, in consultation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services and other knowledgeable sources, shall adopt rules defining the term “construction management” and specifying the nature of bidding requirements under construction management services in order to assist school boards to comply with the public bidding requirements of this section.

Application of this section. Any contract entered into or purchase made in violation of the provisions of this section shall be void; provided, however, that:

The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts for the purchase of books or other materials of instruction.

A school board may name in the specifications and invitations for bids under this section the particular make, kind, or brand of article or articles to be purchased or contracted.

Nothing in this section shall apply to emergency repairs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school board from awarding a school nutrition contract after using any method of bidding or requests for proposals permitted under federal law for award of the contract. Notwithstanding the monetary amount in subsection (a) of this section for which a school board is required to advertise publicly or invite three or more bids or requests for proposal, a school board is required to publicly advertise or invite three or more bids or requests for proposal for purchases made from the nonprofit school food service account for purchases in excess of the federal simplified acquisition threshold when purchasing food or in excess of $25,000.00 when purchasing nonfood items, unless a municipality sets a lower threshold for purchases from the nonprofit school food service account.

Nothing in this section shall prevent school districts or supervisory unions from entering into agreements with other school districts or supervisory unions to conduct joint bidding procedures otherwise consistent with this section.

Nothing in this section shall require a school board to invite or advertise for bids if it elects to purchase goods, materials, or supplies through the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, pursuant to 29 V.S.A. chapter 49.

Nothing in this section shall require a school board or supervisory union board to invite or advertise for bids if it is renewing a contract entered into pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, provided that annual costs will not increase more than the most recent New England Economic Project Cumulative Price Index, as of November 15, for State and local government purchases of goods and services, the total amount of the contract does not exceed an increase of 30 percent more than the total amount of the original contract, and the contract for the renewal period allows termination by the board following an annual review of performance.

Waivers. The State Board shall by rule adopt standards governing the authority of the Secretary to grant individual waivers to the provisions of this section. The rules, at minimum, shall require the school board seeking the waiver to demonstrate to the Secretary that it is unable to comply with the bidding procedure through no fault of its own, and that it has proposed an alternative method of minimizing costs through a fair and public process.

Violations. The State Board may deny State aid for school construction and for debt service on a project that proceeds in violation of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 36; amended

1971, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 5, 1972;

1989, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 75, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 86, eff. May 22, 1996;

1999, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 76, eff. May 24, 2000;

2003, No. 12

, § 1;

2005, No. 54

, § 3;

2007, No. 66

, § 3;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 66, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 63

, § 2;

2019, No. 34

, § 5;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

2021, No. 72

, § 8, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 560.
Condemnation for school purposes.

A school board, or the board of trustees of a public school, may acquire land for school purposes by condemnation. Condemnation shall be accomplished by the procedures and be governed by the limitations established in 24 V.S.A. chapter 77, except that the school board, school district officers, or board of trustees, as the case may be, shall exercise the powers and have the responsibilities given the officers of municipalities in 24 V.S.A. chapter 79.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.

§ 561.
Election of school board members; oath; chair; clerk.

School board members shall be sworn before entering upon the duties of their office. At the meeting next following the election of a school board member, the school board shall elect one of its number to serve as the chair and one other of its number to serve as the clerk. The clerk may be paid upon order of the school board. The clerk shall keep a permanent record of the proceedings of the school board. In the clerk’s absence, another member of the school board shall assume the clerk’s duties.

At least annually, the chairs of each school board within a supervisory union, the chair of the supervisory union board, and the superintendent shall jointly participate in at least eight hours of professional training that, at a minimum, addresses:

educational leadership;

the relative roles and responsibilities of the supervisory union board, the school district boards, and the superintendent;

the Vermont Open Meeting Law,

1 V.S.A. §§ 310-314

;

Vermont law regarding access to public records,

1 V.S.A. §§ 315-320

;

collective bargaining; and

education funding and school finance laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 38; amended

2007, No. 66

, § 4;

2013, No. 56

, § 13, eff. May 30, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 67, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 562.
Powers of electorate.

At a school district meeting, the electorate:

Shall conduct meetings in accordance with Robert’s Rules of Order, unless other rules of order are specifically adopted at a meeting.

Shall elect a moderator at the annual meeting who shall preside at the district meetings, regulate the business thereof, decide questions of order, and make a public declaration of every vote. The moderator may administer oaths to district officers and newly elected school board members. In the moderator’s absence, a moderator pro tempore shall be chosen to preside.

May elect a school district clerk at the annual meeting who shall keep a true record of all proceedings at each district meeting, certify its records, make an attested copy of any records of the district for any person upon request and tender of reasonable fees therefor, if so appointed serve as secretary of the school board, and perform such other duties as may be required by law.

May authorize the school board to retain a public accountant, licensed in this State, to examine the accounts of the treasurer and the school board at the close of each fiscal year and at such other times whenever necessary, and report to the district whether the same are correctly cast and properly vouched.

May vote annual salaries for school board members.

May authorize the payment of actual and necessary expenses of school board members when traveling in the performance of duty.

May authorize the school board to enter into leases of real property for more than three years, to purchase buildings or sites for school purposes, to locate and erect schoolhouses, and to sell, or otherwise dispose of, schoolhouses or sites for same.

Shall authorize at each annual school district meeting an amount of money from all revenue sources to be expended by the board for the support of public schools; and, except for one-time purchase items that the board warns as a separate article, the board shall determine how the authorized funds shall be expended.

May authorize the school board to borrow money not in excess of anticipated revenue for the school year by issuing bonds or notes.

Shall elect school board directors and other officers as are required for each class of school district.

May grant general authority to the school board, at the request of the board, to incur debt at any time within the subsequent five years to finance the cost of school-building energy improvements not to exceed $350,000.00 per building in any three-year period and payable over a maximum term coextensive with the useful life of the financed improvements, but not to exceed ten years, provided that the avoided costs attributable to the financed improvements exceed the annual payment of principal and interest of the indebtedness. No indebtedness shall be incurred under this subdivision unless the entity appointed as an energy efficiency utility under

30 V.S.A. § 209(d)(2)

, an independent licensed engineer, or an independent licensed architect has certified to the district the cost of the improvements to be financed, the avoided costs attributable to the improvements, and the adequacy of debt service coverage from the avoided costs over the term of the proposed indebtedness.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 39; amended

1975, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1979, No. 23

, § 3;

2003, No. 12

, § 2;

2005, No. 54

, § 4;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 58

, § 32, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 68, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 563.
Powers of school boards; form of vote.

The school board of a school district, in addition to other duties and authority specifically assigned by law:

Shall determine the educational policies of the school district. Board policies shall be of general application to the district and shall be in writing, codified, and made available to the public. Board policies shall be adopted at regular or special school board meetings. A school board shall give public notice of its intent to adopt a board policy, stating the substance of the proposed policy, at least ten days prior to its adoption. A school board may also approve or disapprove rules and regulations proposed by the principal or superintendent for the conduct and management of public schools in the district.

May take any action that is required for the sound administration of the school district. The Secretary, with the advice of the Attorney General, upon application of a school board, shall decide whether any action contemplated or taken by a school board under this subdivision is required for the sound administration of the district and is proper under this subdivision. The Secretary’s decision shall be final.

Shall have the possession, care, control, and management of the property of the school district, subject to the authority vested in the electorate or any school district official.

[Repealed.]

Shall keep the school buildings and grounds in good repair, suitably equipped, insured, and in safe and sanitary condition at all times. The school board shall regulate or prohibit firearms or other dangerous or deadly weapons on school premises. At a minimum, a school board shall adopt and implement a policy at least consistent with section 1166 of this title and

13 V.S.A. § 4004

, relating to a student who brings a firearm to or possesses a firearm at school.

Shall have discretion to furnish instruction to students who have completed a secondary education and to administer early educational programs.

May relocate or discontinue use of a schoolhouse or facility, subject to the provisions of sections 821 and 822 of this title.

Shall establish and maintain a system for receipt, deposit, disbursement, accounting, control, and reporting procedures that meets the criteria established by the State Board pursuant to subdivision 164(15) of this title and that ensures that all payments are lawful and in accordance with a budget adopted or amended by the school board. The school board may authorize a subcommittee, the superintendent of schools, or a designated employee of the school board to examine claims against the district for school expenses and draw orders for the payment of those claims. Such orders shall state definitely the purpose for which they are drawn and shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make such payments. It shall be lawful for a school board to submit to its treasurer a certified copy of those portions of the board minutes, properly signed by the clerk and chair, or a majority of the board, showing to whom and for what purpose each payment is to be made by the treasurer, and such certified copy shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make the payments as thus approved.

Shall establish with the advice and consent of the Auditor of Accounts and the Secretary a system of accounts for the proper control and reporting of school district finances and for stating the annual financial condition of the school district.

(11) (A)

Shall prepare and distribute annually a proposed budget for the next school year according to such major categories as may from time to time be prescribed by the Secretary.

(B)

[Repealed.]

(C)

At a school district’s annual or special meeting, the electorate may vote to provide notice of availability of the school budget required by this subdivision to the electorate in lieu of distributing the budget. If the electorate of the school district votes to provide notice of availability, it must specify how notice of availability shall be given, and such notice of availability shall be provided to the electorate at least 30 days before the district’s annual meeting. The proposed budget shall be prepared and distributed at least ten days before a sum of money is voted on by the electorate. Any proposed budget shall show the following information in a format prescribed by the Secretary:

(i)

all revenues from all sources, and expenses, including as separate items any assessment for a supervisory union of which it is a member and any tuition to be paid to a career technical center; and including the report required in subdivision 242(4)(D) of this title itemizing the component costs of the supervisory union assessment;

(ii)

the specific amount of any deficit incurred in the most recently closed fiscal year and how the deficit was or will be remedied;

(iii)

the anticipated homestead tax rate and the percentage of household income used to determine income sensitivity in the district as a result of passage of the budget, including those portions of the tax rate attributable to supervisory union assessments; and

(iv)

the definition of “education spending,” the number of pupils and number of equalized pupils in the school district, and the district’s education spending per equalized pupil in the proposed budget and in each of the prior three years.

(D)

The board shall present the budget to the voters by means of a ballot in the following form:

“Article #1 (School Budget):

Shall the voters of the school district approve the school board to expend $
_______________ , which is the amount the school board has determined to be necessary for the ensuing fiscal year? It is estimated that this proposed budget, if approved, will result in education spending of $ _______________
per equalized pupil. This projected spending per equalized pupil is
_______________
% higher/lower than spending for the current year.

(12)

Shall employ such persons as may be required to carry out the work of the school district pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 242(3) of this title.

(13)

[Repealed.]

(14)

Shall provide, at the expense of the district, subject to the approval of the superintendent, all text books, learning materials, equipment, and supplies.

(15)

Shall exercise the general powers given to a legislative branch of a municipality.

(16)

May execute contracts on behalf of the school district, including contracts providing for binding arbitration, by its chair or any person designated whose appointment is recorded in the minutes of the board.

(17)-(18)

[Repealed.]

(19)

Shall allow any high school student who meets the academic requirements of the high school to graduate and receive a diploma in less than four years.

(20)

Shall establish policies and procedures designed to avoid the appearance of board member conflict of interest.

(21)

Shall have the authority to engage in short-term borrowing to cover the costs of those portions of projects approved by the State Board and that will be reimbursed by the State Board under sections 3447-3456 of this title but which payments will be delayed. However, the board shall borrow under this subdivision only amounts that it would receive if the State Board could fund its obligation and may borrow no earlier than the time it would have received the funds. The State shall not pay for costs of borrowing funds under this subdivision.

(22)

May apply for grants and may accept and expend grants or gifts. The board shall include, in its annual report, a description of all grants or gifts accepted during the year and associated expenditures.

(23)

May, at the expense of the district, present informational materials to the electorate on any matter to be voted. However, such materials shall be limited to those that are reasonably designed to inform, educate, and explain to the electorate the board’s position on the matter.

(24)

Shall adopt a policy that, in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education, will integrate home study students into its schools through enrollment in courses, participation in cocurricular and extracurricular activities, and use of facilities.

(25)

Shall, if it is a school board of a school district that maintains a secondary school, upon request, award a high school diploma to any Vermont resident who served in the military in World War II, the Korean War, or during the Vietnam era, was honorably separated from active federal military service, and does not hold a high school diploma. The State Board shall develop and make available an application form for veterans who wish to request a high school diploma.

(26)

[Repealed.]

(27)

Annually, shall inform each secondary student and the student’s parents or guardians of the right to opt out of the federal requirement that student contact information be provided to military recruiters or institutions of higher education pursuant to

20 U.S.C. § 7908(a)

. A school board shall enable the secondary student and the student’s parents or guardians to disallow provision of student contact information to either military recruiters or institutions of higher education, while allowing provision of information to the other. For purposes of this subdivision, “secondary student” means a student in grade 9, 10, 11, or 12.

(28)

Annually, shall inform students and their parents or guardians of their options for school choice under applicable laws or policy.

(29)

Shall assign an employee to annually:

inform parents of students with life-threatening allergies and life-threatening chronic illnesses of applicable provisions of Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and other applicable federal statutes, State statutes, federal regulations, and State rules;

inform appropriate school staff of their responsibilities; and

provide necessary training to carry out these responsibilities.

(30)

May make available school facilities and equipment for specified public purposes if such purposes appear, in the judgment of the board, to be in the best interests of the district and are an efficient, economical, and appropriate use of the facilities and equipment.

(31)

Subject to the requirements of section 571 of this title, may enter into contracts with other school boards to provide joint programs, services, facilities, and professional or other staff.

(32)

May enter into a contract or contracts with a school offering a distance learning program that is approved by one or more accrediting agencies recognized by the U.S. Department of Education or is approved in Vermont pursuant to subdivision 166(b)(6) of this title.

Shall prepare and distribute to the electorate, not less than ten days prior to the district’s annual meeting, a report of the conditions and needs of the district school system, including the superintendent’s, supervisory union treasurer’s, and school district treasurer’s annual report for the previous school year and the balance of any reserve funds established pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2804

. At a school district’s annual meeting, the electorate may vote to provide notice of availability of the report required by this subdivision to the electorate in lieu of distributing the report. If the electorate of the school district votes to provide notice of availability, it must specify how notice of availability shall be given, and such notice of availability shall be provided to the electorate at least 30 days before the district’s annual or special meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 40; amended

1971, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.);

1975, No. 48

, § 6, eff. April 15, 1975;

1977, No. 33

, § 1;

1979, No. 5

;

1985, No. 71

, § 3;

1987, No. 15

, § 1;

1987, No. 68

, § 5;

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1989, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1989, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1991, No. 103

, §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 35

, § 2;

1995, No. 62

, § 62, eff. April 26, 1995;

1995, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 3;

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7a, 7b, 68, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 27, 1998;

1999, No. 62

, § 158b;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 277;

2001, No. 8

, § 5;

2001, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 36

, §§ 5, 19;

2003, No. 68

, § 48, eff. June 18, 2003;

2003, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005;

2005, No. 54

, § 5;

2005, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 25;

2007, No. 23

, § 1;

2007, No. 82

, § 5;

2009, No. 44

, §§ 4, 6, 8, 9, eff. May 21, 2009;

2009, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 11, 12, eff. June 3, 2010;

2009, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 21c;

2011, No. 58

, § 1, eff. May 31, 2011;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 23, 24, eff. July 1, 2013;

2015, No. 23

, § 32;

2015, No. 46

, § 33;

2015, No. 48

, § 2;

2017, No. 49

, § 27, eff. May 23, 2017;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 64;

2021, No. 20

, § 57.

§ 563a.
Prevention, identification, and reporting of child sexual abuse and sexual violence.

Each school board of a school district and governing body of an approved or recognized independent school shall ensure that adults employed in the schools within its jurisdiction receive orientation, information, or instruction on the prevention, identification, and reporting of child sexual abuse, as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 4912(8)

, and sexual violence. This shall include information regarding the signs and symptoms of sexual abuse, sexual violence, grooming processes, recognizing the dangers of child sexual abuse in and close to the home, and other predatory behaviors of sex offenders. The school board or governing body shall also provide opportunities for parents, guardians, and other interested persons to receive the same information. The Agencies of Education and of Human Services shall provide materials and technical support to any school board or governing body that requests assistance in implementing this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 1

, § 9, eff. July 1, 2011; amended

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 16, 2012;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 70, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 564.
Repealed. 1997, No. 71 (Adj. Sess.), § 106(b), eff. March 11, 1998.

§ 565.
Repealed. 2011, No. 129 (Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 11, 2012.

§ 566.
Authority to borrow.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 562(9) of this title, if a budget for the support of schools for the ensuing year has not been approved on or before June 30 of any year, the school board may borrow funds necessary to enable it to operate the schools on a budget of up to 87 percent of the most recently approved school budget. If the school board borrows money under this section, it shall determine how all funds shall be expended.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 32

, § 1; amended

2001, No. 8

, § 7.

§ 567.
Surplus.

If an audit reveals that a school district has surplus funds, the school board shall carry the funds into the next year as revenue unless authorized by the voters, at an annual or special meeting warned for the purpose, to:

deposit the funds into a reserve fund established pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2804

; or

use the funds for a specific purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 71, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.